
--------------------------------------------------------
bad camera  -267
 Good performance with theatermax  good sound quality  441ppi screen quality  1 day high usage battery efficiency  camera quality moderate.
Camera is OK it s not like 13 mp.
 Good phone with average camera.
Average performance
Not happy with the performance of product.
Some drawbacks are battery getting heated most often  camera is average.
2. rear and front Camera a is one of the worst i took snap in my life.
Front Camera is little bit good as compare to rear camera.
camera not good .
Back camera is not up to the mark but front camera is okay.
Battery backup is OK camera quality is poor  no hanging problem.
front camera is awesomer than other phones 
Battery backup is OK camera quality is poor  no hanging problem 
 Not happy with the performance  ordered on the 1st day of sale  23rd Mar 2016  earlier using lenovo A6000 .
looks are awesome but heating and camera not so good .
The phone is too good  worth for the money   most of the apps are pre installed   the speakers are good   hearing quality is good   camera quality is awesome .
This is a very typical smartphone camera performance in the low to mid.
Camera  both  are ok. Sound Touch Looks all are good but Heating is not acceptable at all as it is a matter of your health and safety.
 everything is very n ice but i am facing with the rear camera and heating issue  heating is not too much but the rear camera is worst  the front is only 5 mp but is very nice but the rear camera is not as good and looks like 2 mp .
 Good camera is not much clear clarity when compared with honor 4x 
all function are good and nice   excluding front camera image quality.
rear and front camera are good.
But in low light camera performance is little poor.
Camera is not good.
Camera quality is too bad worst camera ever seen  don t buy if u want a good camera phone screen quality is at best battery backup is average nd heating up while using continuously 
its iron plus mobile mobile is heating too much and poor camera quality.
i downloaded the  open camera  app from google play store  for the camera  it gives the good settings to use the camera.
very bad camera selfy good  battery very poor  camera sensar is very slow
Rear camera is not upto mark like a 8 MP camera but good on outdoor condition
No lag  camera is good but not as good as moto g3.
Front camera will make you less unhappy  not bad but not good as well.
Over all good phone within the budget but camera quality very poor .
camera quality is poor.
Now about the camera thats too good.
 front camera without flash   heating problem 
But had little fear to open this coz so many of written about this phone like camera not good and heating prbm.
front camera is good.
Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus disadvantages or cons is with the primary camera performance in low light condition which is not good at all  and so as the secondary camera as well.
 Main Problem Over Heat and Hanging Problem Back Camera Not Godd Frant Camera is fine and other problms 
A very nice phone with very good performance  camera sharp display nice look etc.
3 camera works good for selfy lover but back camera is belowe average just approx.
if u r apple user in past  you will be happy with this battrey performance.
overall camera performance below average Heating issues really disappointing other factors are ok. Pros 
Nic phn but camera is not that good.
camera quality very low .
camera quality is average.
i see a blue coloured covering at the back camera and but the photo is clearly white should i remove that   
But camera quality is really poor.
2. camera quality is very poor like 3mp if objects moved when taking photos we get blured images
Excellent phone in this range  display is awesome  Battery is good  performance is good  overall phone is good  I was waiting from a long time to buy a phone like this  I do not want to buy a phone which is 5.
frong camera is good
Both front   back camera poor heats like oven while charging   using net.
 Nic phn but camera is not that good.
2  Camera quality is very poor 
Camera quality is very bad.
Primary 13 megapixel camera quality is not good in low light condition.
1. primary camera is good but not as good as its competitor xiaomi redmi 3.
Camera is OK  not so good.
Bt somewhere camera is not so good as expected.
Remaing Camera quality is not as such good like 13MP camera 
Front camera is not impressive.
Camera Quality is worst
And camera quality also poor.
In specs it is specified that camera is 13 mp but image quality is worse than a 5 mp camera image.
 if you want to buy metal body  only for looks  looks  2GB RAM  13 5 MP camera  removable battery  you can buy it without any question  every think is perfect except gorilla glass is missing and the metal quality not is upto the mark  it will be got easily scratches if you not used the protection.
phone is good but camera is very poor.
3 Both Cameras is just Ok Ok As compare to K3 Note  
front camera is best 
Front camera is good but not impressive.
CAMERA IS VERY LOW QUALITY 
Camera is okay  touch response is not good  16gb  expandable to 64gb  letv is better than this 
Camera is also not that good.
Camera is very poor quality.
Performance is great but not great for heavy users.
 The primary camera of the phone is very poor it is company claims 13mp camera but the photos has quality less than 5mp cameras of Nokia   Samsung brands.
This is good phone to use   with good primary and secondary camera.
Battery temperature is too high tried with all the apps of battery coolers still the phone is getting heat and primary camera is not good.
I like the phone and its overall performance  would like to recommend to those looking for a good branded phone at under 10K.
Performance is very bad.
camera quality is very good front and rare both
5 rating for back camera.
Rear Camera is not good it don t detailed image even is super fine mode  if anyone is looking for a good camera this is not the right phone.
 Awesome phone  But camera quality is average and gaming graphics is good.
 handset is awesome features are awesome camera quality awesome but battery not good very highly disappointed with the service of battery and mobile gets heated up very soon music quality good .
complete money for value thing camera is good but not best look is pretty sexy processing is awesome ui is good overall sexy phone go for it except the camera 
 i buy it and socked to operate this phone that how can a best brand can make a cheap mobile plz dont ever buy heating problem and also camera is not so good 
camera is good as a13 mp should infact almost equivalent to Redmi note 3s 16 mp 
camera also not good as 13mp front camera is good and there is some heating issue also.
Performance not that much.
Although the phone is very awesome in their price range only the back camera is very disappointing.
Overall performance is very good.
Good look body is nice charge fast front camera is good but back camera is not good compare as K3.
I have purchased Lenovo vibe K5 plus mobile from flip kart and finds considerable heating issues and very poor in camera performance.
and when we open front camera cell lagging.
and camera quality is not too good.
Average front camera.
It is one of the best phone in light range with good built quality and awesome audio sound but camera not so good though 
Camera is not so good as it should be  though it is 13mp and front 5mp  GPU  adreno 405  is good and Processor is also good.
it is over heating and camera is very bad 
Camera performance is not very good  but with google camera  it seems bit better  though I have not tested it thoroughly.
Dolby atmos is good  camera is average  that too in HDRmode  
Hello I am use this phone five day 2 phone really looking excellent battery backup excellent not heating problem camera quality acceptable not bad and all specification good I don t understand others customer reviews like heating problem 
n camera is not good at all.
With some heating issue in starting now after 20days it s OK. Its rear camera is ok. front camera is very good.
Drastic Heating problem and very very poor camera raise the questions on the performance of brand like lenovo and no keypad lights no front flash and no earphones were the biggest drawbacks.
No doubt it is budget phone giving you the features of 13k but after compromising with the quality  All is good  Camera is below average  Trust me it does not heat much  Look is great.
 full hd display is awsome   good camera  superb sound led notification light  battery is capable for one and half day normal use
Average Camera Quality 
5k when compared to all the budget phones like lenovo it is very decent phone with best features but only problem is over heating while charging but all are good for this price primary camera is best but front camera is shaking while rotating here and their.
 The Phone i have purchased first day i am very interesting look wise very good and light weight but SIM 2 is 2G support and not coneected the network and camera not good quality and sound effective is good in put the full value if decrease the half the value is very slow bad to hear the songs or voice compare to samsung galaxy S duos with 5 maega pixal camera is very good.
nice phone with good look but poor camera.
camera is not good .
Camera is just ok as the low light photography is not good.
Front camera is good but rear one is not like 13mp.
Phone is average in performance  over heating is the big issue with the phone  camera is average .
Lots of heating issues with it and Camera quality is very bad.
5 k as aspect is good  camera quality not satisfactory as compare 13 mega fixal.
Camera is good  but not excellent.
 Only negative point is the camera i. e camera quality is not good as boasted of 13mp camera .
1  front camera is very bad that it shows different colors.
Every thing is good specially front camera is very good and back is not that much good but it is also more than average but one problem is there in calling you can not pick calls during calling with someone and also conferencing is not possible so please I request to lenovo to please resolve this problem as soon as possible and I am writing this review after using the phone one month.
Good Phone but very poor camera quality.
camera quality is very worst 
Camera quality is bit disappointing.
5 GHZ  the performance is slow only .
It s front camera is awesome.
front camera is awesome.
In time delivery of product is appreciated but about Lenevo Vibe K5 Plus  the Camera is not very good as expected and heating problem is there.
battery performance is not so great.
 not really happy with the camera quality.awesome camera  271
Lenovo lunching is great phone great price and great performance great speed of net running
Camera is OK  Front is good
 Good performance with theatermax  good sound quality  441ppi screen quality  1 day high usage battery efficiency  camera quality moderate.
Camera is OK  but the real issue is heat.
Display superb  camera ok  4G is superfast fine.
Both camera are good.
front camera also good.
And Expecting For More Good Camera Quality 
Camera quality is good.
Performance is good.
Battery performance is OK 
good performance best at tis price comparing with Samsung j series and micromax mobiles Lenovo given a best   
Battery back is good  Camera Result is Good .
Front and rear camera quality is very good.
especially camera features very good 
5 ghz coupled with 2 gb ram deliver decent performance.
camera quality both from and back good.
Battery backup is OK camera quality is poor  no hanging problem.
front camera is awesomer than other phones 
also the front camera is very good.
Battery backup is OK camera quality is poor  no hanging problem 
Very good product  no heating and camera is also good .
Dolby atmos is good  camera is average  that too in HDRmode  
good camera quality awesome sound and Full HD display quality and super build quality with metal finish.
Good camera 
all function are good and nice   excluding front camera image quality.
Rear camera is also good.
rear and front camera are good.
Display and sound quality is nice  but it heats a lot and musics tend to get crack on music player whenever I try to open gallery  battery performance is average.
If any looks for a better camera performance pls don t buy this product.
Camera quality is too bad worst camera ever seen  don t buy if u want a good camera phone screen quality is at best battery backup is average nd heating up while using continuously 
its iron plus mobile mobile is heating too much and poor camera quality.
Phone performance is good as expectation.
camera is also good.
camera is ok 
nice look  excellent performance  good camera  clear voice.
2 low light camera performance is not good altough can t complain considering the price 
performance is good.
front camera is good.
Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus disadvantages or cons is with the primary camera performance in low light condition which is not good at all  and so as the secondary camera as well.
But i was satisfied with performance Because i didn t expect too much specifications in that budget.
A very nice phone with very good performance  camera sharp display nice look etc.
I compared this camera to my old MMX Spark  and both the cameras are of equal quality.
Thanks to Lenovo to design such a high performance and good looking phone in affordable rate.
camera is good screen quality is very good.
Camera quality is great screen clarity is great even in sunny days.
5  Touch performance is very smooth
3 camera works good for selfy lover but back camera is belowe average just approx.
Good camera quality best picture and audio quality.
handy  light decent camera  easy UI  good sound and sleek design 
Hence  I am not comfortable with its overall performance 
Front camera is also good.
Good battery backup and good camera clarity  
Front camera is excellent.
Camera quality is also fine.
 Display is good  viewing angles are fine  minor lags occurs but they are negligible  Camera is not upto the mark   low light and indoor photos seem to be too noisy.
It slowed down the mobile performance after installing 20 apps.
Camera performance also very good.
The Camera is also decent and the front cam is very good.
1  Best Performance in all manner like multiple app processing and playing high definition video.
If any looks for a better camera performance pls don t buy this produ 
Good performance.
Nice model so sleek design light weight good camera and great performance 
please do not purchase this mobile phone low performance more heating and battery performance is very bad.
Camera quality is okay 
 Good camera  good speakers with very good sound quality and clearity 
Camera quality is also good could have been better though.
if your thinking abt a phone with a good camera   this phone has avergae camera.
Camera is ok.
Very good front n rear camera 
The camera quality is good for rear camera front camera is so so.
Remaing Camera quality is not as such good like 13MP camera 
So dnt wry abt it  even camera is good.
performance is good with 2 GB ram.
 Camera result bit disappointed me it s look like 3mp sharp display excellent performance  nice battery backup Dolby sound  
My 4 years old Samsung Y with 2MP camera produces similar  little less  quality photos  honestly speaking.
stylish   nice performance .
It s a very nice product with a very good camera and music quality.
Resolution is really bright and performance is good for a normal user.
Good camera both front and back 
camera good but front cam disappointed me.
4 Without knowing mobile performance they put F Advantage now it is removed 
if u r expecting the high processing speed and good camera in Rs8500 then you will get disappointed with this phone.
Performance  stylinsh and camera quality are good.
but didnt even felt one lag till now or got struck  performance is depends on user usage.
I am very satisfied with the performance display and style.
Good Camera.
Front camera is good
Front camera quality is much better than other high end phones.
camera is good.
Camera is good.
Back camera is not up to the mark but front camera is okay.
 The primary camera of the phone is very poor it is company claims 13mp camera but the photos has quality less than 5mp cameras of Nokia   Samsung brands.
Camera is good 
but the front camera is not 13 mp it is 8 mp.
camera quality is good.
camera is ok
nice performance.
the m3 Note has bad performance and Redmi has a below.
camera quality is very good front and rare both
2. camera is not too good means there is blur effect while moving camera slightly  and front camera is also not fine as i am having lumia 640 with .
7 as listed  over heats a lot while charging  camera is good 
camera seems ok for now.
camera also not good as 13mp front camera is good and there is some heating issue also.
Good built  nice looking gadget with a decent performance.
Overall performance is very good.
Good look body is nice charge fast front camera is good but back camera is not good compare as K3.
camera is very good
The camera is okay  the front camera could have been better I suppose.
It looks very slim used for 12 hours and it is pretty good and the Camera shutter speed is slight laggy.
the back camera is of 13 MP but it dose not look like .
1 GB ram free at startup  Brilliant Display FULL HD of 1920 x 1020p  Camera is also good  front is also good  battery is of Great capacity 2750mAh .
selfie camera is good.
but when update my system software then no heating problems and camera became much better.
The phone looks rather bland from the front and capacitive buttons on the front are not backlit.
Camera is ok will do in most cases.
Camera performance is not very good  but with google camera  it seems bit better  though I have not tested it thoroughly.
Camera is OK  can t say it is excellent.
i like this mobile it has really very good sound quality good camera.
Hello I am use this phone five day 2 phone really looking excellent battery backup excellent not heating problem camera quality acceptable not bad and all specification good I don t understand others customer reviews like heating problem 
Performance is decent and the Lenovo Diagnostics app is very good to check the hardware performance.
good camera  great screen  heats up a little  nice battery  great looks  nice slim piece perfect for single hand operation  metalic body and most important value for money
camera is good
Camera is nice and looks are awesome but a heating problem but can be solve by 75MB update and one more problem is the speaker yes when you will hold it your palm will block the speakers and no marshmallow update till now .
Front Camera is also good.
With some heating issue in starting now after 20days it s OK. Its rear camera is ok. front camera is very good.
 Mobile look are very nice   camera is good click .
It is great mobile with best sound effect and it s ran is excellent it s very good for performance 
Camera very good but heating problem.
Don t want to speak much on processing  camera  battery backup and so on as at this price its doing its job well.
Camera quality is good but heats at charging time and unable to install Lenovo PC suit software like Nokia PC suit.
Very good sound quality with nice camera and touch.
Front camera 5MP is very good.
Good camera quality.
Camera is good and battery back is also OK 
1  awesome camera front and back
Front camera will make you less unhappy  not bad but not good as well.
Performance is good  it was heating a bit initially   but after the OTA update now the heating issue has resolved.
Every thing is good specially front camera is very good and back is not that much good but it is also more than average but one problem is there in calling you can not pick calls during calling with someone and also conferencing is not possible so please I request to lenovo to please resolve this problem as soon as possible and I am writing this review after using the phone one month.
Battery performance is OK  
I have seen some reviews saying lack of camera quality  but the camera quality is really good.
Other wise it has better performance .
A decent camera quality with decent looks and good sound quality.
The 5 MP front camera is far better  though it also lacks a certain punch.
It s front camera is awesome.
front camera is awesome.
frong camera is good
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
 Good Quality of phone But Disappointed With some issues like overheating and Camera Quality camera quality is change littile bit after update of 95mb but need more improvement 
good camera  fast recharging   fast Processors 
13 MP rear camera is as good as a 8 MP cheap chinese cameraphone.
Rear camera is pretty good.
Selfie camera quality is just good enough and can be improved further
Good enough camera quality
Performance is good in its class.
--------------------------------------------------------
worst mobile  -48
Especially when gifting elders who do not use specialized headphones the in box stock ones are a small loss.
overall good product.
The product is quiet good means above average.
No easy return procedure  customers are not support for return this product 
Overall  very good product for 8500 bucks with given features  
As far as my usage this mobile is good if you are not a regular internet user.
they are ready to give another mobile but same k5 note vive plus .
 It is really a competative product with good quality performance and all required latest features finds very easy to use  i feel highly satisfied in useing the phone very comfortably
Lenovo vibe k5 plus mobile are very thirdcllas mobile  atometicali mobile are battery low and high temprecther hited.
nice looks on the go plus you have also the advantage of vr bundle but you wont get that with this product have some heating issues but a nice product by lenovo to trust on.
Browsing on K5 plus is not bad but I was expecting better.
Thanks to lenovo for giving such nice product in such minimum price 
i turn on the device after charging at 4 pm.
Although not as great as compared to One Plus phones but a decent one.
Conclusion  The price we are paying for this device is not worth of it.
So if you just want to flaunt and not an high mobile user this mobile can be ur good companion but if your usage is high  seriously avoid it.
a nice product really i enjoyed .
 The product is quite good if you are not playing heavy games.
very good mobile in such a low price.
The product is so nice and very attractive that I love to buy another one.
Nice product in that price but the rear camera is not so completable in room light.
overall it is good product.
Not a good product.
Nice product but the grip is not so good.
 i buy this product its very good an coming to the features of this mobile its awesome but he dint give ear phones with this mobile 
 Don t Buy Lenovo vibe k5 plus mobile very very worst mobile Very Heating problem Camera quality normal   recharge demo sim not working in both sim slot .
 Very good product in 8499 no heating issue after update but camera not up to the mark rest all things good phone I think you should buy it but lenovo should give update for camera rest all good 
Overall it is a good product.
The color reproduction is horrible and the sensors just don t seem to function.
Nice Phone The performance offered by the new device is worth a commendation since it is powered by a Snapdragon 616 Octa.
But overall mobile is good 
 it is an exellent product at low price with awesome dolby atmos sound and good battery life.
it s advisable not to buy this product in same price you will get better product.
Overall good product 
I returned the product and spending a little extra for the same features but for a higher model and going for a company which has good after sales service.
On the whole the mobile device is not up to the mark as specified.
 I am purchases lenovo vibe K5 plus on may 5th my mobile observed heating problem.
I m gonna speak to lenovo and give them a mouthful first before I return this product.
Mobile is good but Not Best awesome mobile  113
This mobile is good in terms of look  quality and light weight design.
Rest the product is really nice.
Product is good and upto the mark for it s cost.
 It s good mobile.
Thanks to lenovo for giving such nice product in such minimum price 
Lenovo vibe k5 plus nice mobile.
 Good Product with economical price  Better and faster delivery .
Very good product  no heating and camera is also good .
love the product good one 
Also mobile is looking good.
 A Good product specially the sound of the phone.
 Nice to use  camera is good  touch is good  the overall experience with the mobile is excellent 
Nice product excellent service hats up to flipkart thanks to flipkart team 
 Very good mobile.
Over all the Mobile is good.
Over all product is good no wastage of Money.
 Nice product.
 Very good mobile  looking so beautiful.
 Very good mobile within budget having all the necessary apps and with good configuration for a middle class person.
overall good product.
Overall  very good product for 8500 bucks with given features  
 I m totally disappointed with Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus due to over heating problem and batter backup.
The mobile is good but some problems are there
 Very good product.
 Device is good.
Good branded product with reasonable pricing.
Very very good product .
good mobile under 8500 don t expect everything 
Mobile is very good in its all features.
when the mobile is switched on  firstly it was good.
I said software part of the device is ok how did you check camera performance and heating issue.
 Very good product faster delivery velue of money very much setisfied with it 
 nice product by lenovo .
very good Product if u have low budget.
I m gonna speak to lenovo and give them a mouthful first before I return this product.
mobile is good in these range.
Mobile is very good most important it s display it very good.
It s a very nice product with a very good camera and music quality.
and after its latest update this device get more reliable and no heating issue now.
 i buy this product its very good an coming to the features of this mobile its awesome but he dint give ear phones with this mobile 
I suggest this is a good product with cost.
Nice product.
lenovo k5 are so good mobile cemra are so good 
Good product.
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
Good product for the money.
Good nice one this is awesome product.
this mobile is nice for looking and best budget phone good screen and processor but a little heating problem 
 Good mobile for 8.
Overall it is a good product.
Do think to much to buy this product.
Browsing on K5 plus is not bad but I was expecting better.
very good mobile in such a low price.
overall it is good product.
Display has good color reproduction.
 Its a good product but thr is so much fault in this product.
Coming to the real topic of discussion  the Lenovo vibe k5 plus is pretty sturdy and handsome looking smartphone.
 Good mobile with better looks.
The product is very good from first look and performs well compared to the price.
I received Lenovo K5 Plus mobile phone on 31.
 This Phone is a very good product.
Overall good product 
Nice product nice battery backup Nd good camera quality Nd good display .
I brought this lenovo vibe k5 plus on 25th March 2016  writing the review after 1week used  mobile was simply superb  
The price we are paying for this device is justifiable   yeah initially there was heating issues which were solved by prompt reviews and updates by Lenovo Team .
nice product in this budget  battery   display very good also look of the handset is nice  nice product in this budget  battery   display very good also look of the handset is nice 
I have purchased Lenovo vibe K5 plus mobile from flip kart and finds considerable heating issues and very poor in camera performance.
Lenovo k5 plus is just awesome   
 Good product.
It s a great device   I am using it almost 12.
Good product have some sort of heating issue but faults could be removed 
This mobile is pretty good.
 Mobile looks good but its getting heating while listening music  watching movies and taking pics and video.
Mobile was good.
 Product is good for that Price.
they are ready to give another mobile but same k5 note vive plus .
 Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus is nice one but there is no earphones are giving by flipkart.
A a very good phone but some problems occur like the heating otherwise it s a very good product.
Otherwise  the device is good in the price range.
a nice product really i enjoyed .
 It is very good mobile having just extremely heating problem on the day first come to me but it is a very useful and budgeted mobile in this price.
This mobile battery is over heating it is not a good lot of heat while working on mobile this is the worst product .
 Dear this Mobile is not good and charger of this mobile was very defective 
Mobile looks stylish and very good.
 Nice product .
Very good mobile in this price range.
 Good Product.
 Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus is nice  thin  handy.
 i buy it and socked to operate this phone that how can a best brand can make a cheap mobile plz dont ever buy heating problem and also camera is not so good 
But overall mobile is good 
It was really a good product.
 Good mobile this price tag.
 i have purchase a new phone lenovo vibe k5 plus tomorrow it will not a good phone it very bad product.
 This is a very good mobile and in a very low cost all features are latest as well .
--------------------------------------------------------
bad display  -27
Sharp display due to high PPI and resolution graphics are intense because of anderno GPU 405 
Display   Display is very crisp and at the given price you will not get better display than this.
phone has a good display and music and does not hangs .
premium display with wide viewing display
body display not good
Performance  The phone has got Bright  brighter than Sony Xperia Z2  and sharp display  just like Sony Xperia Z2  so viewing screen is a great experience.
Sound is good and the display is sharp.
Display  Display is ok. Not that great like 1080p.
5  Display is very bad.
 full hd display is awsome   good camera  superb sound led notification light  battery is capable for one and half day normal use
The cons is its screen 1080p resolution is fantastic very good sharp display quality contrast level is good u I ll.
but never saw such a vibrant display after using an iphone.
I did not find it better than my redmi2 720p display.
Very good and sharp display
 Camera result bit disappointed me it s look like 3mp sharp display excellent performance  nice battery backup Dolby sound  
  Beautiful Display  outdoor too 
The display is very sharp due to high PPI.good display  113
3. very nice display sleek phone
Sharp display due to high PPI and resolution graphics are intense because of anderno GPU 405 
 Good build quality looking good sound quality awesome display also good high graphic game run without any problem great deal in this range.
Apart from that  gorgeous display  impressive battery backup.
Good display  
Ratherthan its a nice phone with full Hd.
A very nice phone with very good performance  camera sharp display nice look etc.
Initially facing some battery issue but after OTA update battery issue some how resolved As phone provide full HD display  we can t expect 6 hour video streaming .
Display is good  Switching between apps is quite easy.
get best experience of viewing full HD vedios.
but never saw such a vibrant display after using an iphone.
Good Display 
Brilliant display and excellent speakers.
Good looking mini handset good display sound very clean and nice good battery back up 
Excellent display  Good battery backup  Extraordinary sound.
Amazing display
 Awesome phone with great Display.
Phone is great  display and sound are superb  Cameras are good considering the price of the phone.
The display is the best in this price range and the touch response is good   battery life is so so   build quality is great and so is the RAM management .
Games  net  watching full HD videos everything great with this phone.
display is awesome because of its 441 ppi which feels like fhd while watching movies.
sometimes notification of call and sms display remains even after opening the same.
2016. good display.
Performance is really awesome  Fully aluminium casing light weight excellent display and stylish design so I will rate this 5.
Camera is awesome  display is awesome  
awesome display and touch was very smooth than other mobiles  
Very good and sharp display
This phone is really good and handy in 5 inch with excellent display and performance.
only heating issues  takes more downloading time  if goriila glass is there means it would be perfect for the display.
theater max is awesome  display is good 
Camera  both front and back  sound  display  look  touch response and everything is very good except it has some heating effect.
I did not find it better than my redmi2 720p display.
TOUCHSCREEN AND DISPLAY feels quite good and works flawlessly without any lags.
HD Display is very good.
Perfect feel  sound  display and everything.
the Qualcomm Snapdragon616 is actually 615 in my opinion and i have check it by many third party app they all showed 615 the is actually heat a lot then come to screen display is good almost great very good color viewing angle but no screen toughness 
Very good display
Good display
touch display.
It has great display.
premium display with wide viewing display
super display .
Display is nice.
Par performance to baap hai no hanging problem I played mortal combat 5 Nova 3 and many games performance was good screen quality awesome full HD 440ppi 
1. great display with good side view.
The display looks awesome and the touch sennsitivity is also very good.
 display is as great.
HD display is very good.
Display Is good.
1 Display is very good
good display
Good Display and Dolby Sound when playing in quality Headset.
display is nice 
look wise it is fabulous  Good display   Good touch response 
nice product in this budget  battery   display very good also look of the handset is nice  nice product in this budget  battery   display very good also look of the handset is nice 
The cons is its screen 1080p resolution is fantastic very good sharp display quality contrast level is good u I ll.
Mobile is very good most important it s display it very good.
 Camera result bit disappointed me it s look like 3mp sharp display excellent performance  nice battery backup Dolby sound  
Very good display.
Good UI  software  display  touch response.
--------------------------------------------------------
bad_sound  -33
ion 2750 mah  Screen Guard and guide book also warranty card but not with earphones  DOLBY adjusts any earphone to give out great sound mainly with those rubber earphones .
I love the phone  no lagging nice for gaming  sleek and classy  camera is not that as i ve expected but it s fine nice dolby atmos.
I own a Lenovo Vibe K4 Note as well which has truly amazing Dolby effect.
 Nice sound quality ultimate touch.
 The Phone i have purchased first day i am very interesting look wise very good and light weight but SIM 2 is 2G support and not coneected the network and camera not good quality and sound effective is good in put the full value if decrease the half the value is very slow bad to hear the songs or voice compare to samsung galaxy S duos with 5 maega pixal camera is very good.
This is the waste of money overheating problem in this phone please don t buy this item sound quality is poor.
Fingerprint sensor is not there Heat quickly as much as of use Dolby sound is good.
Dolby double speaker was awesome 
Dolby sound is good but not best  
Quality is very good  2 GB RAM   16GB IN Bilt Camera quality is very Good  also DOLBY loud speaker sound is very nice and sweet.
Only heating issue but this issue ia now with every phone but i loved its sound quality original Dolby sound overall at this price phone is very good.
Nothing Special with DOLBY ATMOS.
Head phone quality is bad and a kind of sound is coming when the call is connecting.
1 considering dolby atmos dual speaker audio output is not that great
Not The best phone at this price   Sound quality is incredibly good.
Xiaomi Redmi note 3 that are good smartphone but lacks the primeum built and design   Ya Coolpad got a fingerprint sensor but it is very lagging in high graphics game and sound quality is also not that good too.
Display and sound quality is nice  but it heats a lot and musics tend to get crack on music player whenever I try to open gallery  battery performance is average.
and sound quality is also fav.good sound  111
4  Dolby digital sound quality is 5 star.
phone performance is best and sound quality is very good.
SOUND QUALITY is NICE can say near to superb.
 Good build quality looking good sound quality awesome display also good high graphic game run without any problem great deal in this range.
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound
i like this mobile it has really very good sound quality good camera.
 Very good mobile  very good sound quality  decent look   of course great delivery by flipkart 
3  Sound Quality is extraordinary.
 Good performance with theatermax  good sound quality  441ppi screen quality  1 day high usage battery efficiency  camera quality moderate.
Very good phone in this range  display and sound clarity are high quality.
Dolby atmos sound is crisp and clear  
dolby sound again is applaudable.
have to buy good haedphone to experience dolby atmos great sound.
Sound quality is as good as of Sony  that I was using from past 5 years .
Good Sound quality
Sound quality is good
Very good sound quality with nice camera and touch.
Audio is simply superb  dolby does it job well.
Easy and handy fast and awesome sound quality my Iphone headsets works awesome with it 
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound.
Camera  Smoothness and awesome Dolby sound make real fun to watch movies.
awesome sound quality  specifically dolby ATMOS 
The Dolby Atmos enabled sound is crystalline.
it looks awesome and sound quality is amazing my all problems are solved with related to mobile finally i gt a superb mobile  .
and sound quality is also fav.
speakers are very loud and thanks to Dolby atoms for the good sound .
its speaker is very good dolby.
sound quality is awsum
Sound quality is good only at peak volume.
Very good sound quality
Sound quality is quite good.
Sound quality is superb even loudspeaker is also in Dolby Digital.
Sound quality is awesome.
Dolby Atmos sound enhancement 
HD quality is awesome with best sound of a speaker .
Quality is very good  2 GB RAM   16GB IN Bilt Camera quality is very Good  also DOLBY loud speaker sound is very nice and sweet.
SPEAKERS are really good with Dolby Atmos feature.
n only sound quality is good.
the only good this about this phone is its sound quality.
Best sound quality  picture view is also very clear.
Battery back up is satisfactory  sound quality is nice.
nice touch  and its sound quality is amazing.
 it is an exellent product at low price with awesome dolby atmos sound and good battery life.
Though the inclusion of Dolby Atmos is great  the positioning of speakers on the back is disappointing.
3  Good Sound quality
DOLBY digital sound  can give 5 star for its sound  
 Good camera  good speakers with very good sound quality and clearity 
sound quality superb
Digital Dolby sound   picture qualities are so attractive missing ear phone in this set.
sound quality is awesome 
Excellent Dolby speaker.
Good sound quality  good display quality.
only thing i loved in this phone is its dolby digital sound quality.
Only heating issue but this issue ia now with every phone but i loved its sound quality original Dolby sound overall at this price phone is very good.
A decent camera quality with decent looks and good sound quality.
handy light weight sound quality very good .
Dolby Atmos is amazing.
Sound is awesome with Dolby and the stereo speakers.
with awesome sound using dolby atmos.
--------------------------------------------------------
heating issue  -64
yes it was having too much heating issues but now after updating to 2 new system updates its stable and not getting hot.
 Too much heating.
Generic issue of Battery heating
It is worst heating issue and network issue.
heating issue but it is not very high problem heat is slightly lower 
No notable heating Issues with regular usage or light games.
Compare to K3Note   A7000  the heating issue is extreme high  it leads to ear pain and headache.
 all features are good but i face heating problem while charging and continuous usage it s an major draw back about my phone and remaing features are awesome in the range of money 
But little heating problem  may be after some days the heating problem will be resolved automatically.
I would not recommend this mobile  because of overheating issue.
 I am facing heating issue other than that everything is good.
overall camera performance below average Heating issues really disappointing other factors are ok. Pros 
this mobile is nice for looking and best budget phone good screen and processor but a little heating problem 
if anyone want to buy this mobile then he   she can definitely purchase this  dont worry for any heating issue.
BEFORE UPDATE you feel HEATING ISSUE  but AFTER UPDATING there will not so much heating Issue  I think whatever level it heats up after updating phone once  is because of snapdragon processor.
Not much heating problem as many reviews pointed out.
further if you are not happy with that heating problem remove all unwanted apps and especially lenovo apps which run continously in the background.
This mobile battery is over heating it is not a good lot of heat while working on mobile this is the worst product .
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
just a little heating problem is there.
bhai mst phone hai little bit heat hota h par uska update aa chuka h display quality badhia h look is stunninggg with back almunimum panel or jo ye starting ke review me jo bkwass likh rkha h na heating like a microwave oven sb bakwas h ab itne cost mein iphone ki quality thodi milege gi and one more thinh no hanging issue at alll running jhakass tension mat le lee mtlb phone le  
Initially I too faced heating issue.
much heating issue so i revert back and flipkart as online portal help me .
 everything is very n ice but i am facing with the rear camera and heating issue  heating is not too much but the rear camera is worst  the front is only 5 mp but is very nice but the rear camera is not as good and looks like 2 mp .
the phone is good but the main problem is abnormal heating and battery draing.
Only there is a single problem Heating Issue 
But this overheating problem being really intolerable  I am going to return the product.
Heating problem was initially present and it stopped AFTER SOFTWARE UPDATE.
 Don t Buy Lenovo vibe k5 plus mobile very very worst mobile Very Heating problem Camera quality normal   recharge demo sim not working in both sim slot .
Overall heating problem Normal using
The phone has some real heating issues which makes its usage uncomfortable at times.
great fetuers having in your budget  but have power and too much heating problem  so I suggest don t go with this.
 Even apple phones heat up now a days  so heating is not the major problem.
Till then many reviews had come up and most of them were negative  speaking about the heating problem  bad camera  etc.
Not that much heating issue as many of review i saw from people
Little heating problem but it is natural with high end processor   metal back.
But only a small heating issue.
Many users have complained about the devices heating problem  but in my view the heating is very slight and not a point to be noticed.no heating  86
The speaker is of Dolby Atmos which is very premium and with Theater Max it is just awesome  
 Its good experience for me with filpkart i listen filpkart sale Quality product i relay not happy with Filpkart CSR team what i brought Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus mobile from Filpkart its geeting overheating issue 
and after its latest update this device get more reliable and no heating issue now.
Major heating issue when you give work load to the processor.
The most disappointment one is battery and heating issue.
 Everything is good  except the heating issue while using the applications   camera.
 LITTLE HEATING PROBLEM EXCEPT THIS EVERY THING IS OK FLIPKART SHOULD PROVIDE A HARD BACK COVER AND A TEMPERED GLASS WITH ITS ALL MOBILE SO THAT CUSTOMER SHOULD NOT WONDER TO FIND IT FOR SAFETY OF ITS MOBILE.
 Great phone  no heating problem  good camera  All other features are excellent.
Its heats up drastic high when you use the fone with 3G for 10 mintues 
 but its has an heating issue while on calls and using apps  
and mobile heats sometimes.
The ones who are complaing about heating problem will be very satisfied now.
No heating issue .
Too much heating issue.
Problem of heating is due to excess of RAM and Battery usage from the they very own Lenovo apps  default  like the launcher itself eats lot of RAM.
But In that ph Some heating issue.
The phone is really good from all aspects except the major heating problem  which still remains even after the latest software update of 119mb.
Heating  battery is major issue.
Overall all spec and function  I am satisfied but its heating issue disappointing me.
I have two more phones from lenovo which do not have such heating issues  A6000    but this phones beats all odds  sarcastically   .
I would to tell that heating issue which is observe becoz the back panel of device as some point to connect as circuit.
There is a heating issue but it can be neglected.
I haven t seen any heating issue so far.
Heating issue is due to processor  Qualcomm Snap Dragon 615. first of all this my first i have used many lenevos phone it does have heating at uncomfortable levle
In particular I liked this product a lot but the nly issue with it is the heating issue.
after update there are no any heating issue and performence increase 
 The phone what I received 2 days back is good but there is so much of heating problem.
Amazingggg performance camera is so nice ui is solo good no heating issues its perfect for budget gamer  
this mobile having more heating problem you can t speak 10 mins continuously through this mobile also flipkart service response very irresponsible 
Many of my friends have said that   it has major heating issue  which is more or less correct   But nobody thinks that it s got a METALLIC BACK Cover  which is removable .
after updating the Lenovo K5  heating issue is gone  normal heating  which is acceptable.
 Very huge problem with over heating  not just mild like other phones but very much over heat.
much heating issue so i revert back and flipkart as online portal help me .
So much heating during charging of the phone that you can t touch.
First of all  others are telling about heating problem  but i want to tell you there is an update of about 150 MB which solved this problem and now they re is no heating issue  so.
Too much heating
having some heating issue but was solved after the update
 Don t Buy Lenovo vibe k5 plus mobile very very worst mobile Very Heating problem Camera quality normal   recharge demo sim not working in both sim slot .
Booked this phone in the very first wave of sale  although the mobile looks and works good the only reason I have to rate it down for is  the heating issue .
looks vise phone is pretty gud   there is so much heating issue 
Fantastic except some heating issue.
I said software part of the device is ok how did you check camera performance and heating issue.
Too much heating.
but very much heating.
this model is loking good   process speed is gud camrera   but major problem is phon heating when you use .
But depending on features at a time we can expect that but heating issue is major problem.
heating issue is laughable if compared to le eco 1s.
 I am purchases lenovo vibe K5 plus on may 5th my mobile observed heating problem.
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
Observed heating issues with the set when received.
It has some heating issue.
No heating issue.
I would say that after some system update there will be no heating issue.
2. heating issue
at first heats but after 110mb update no heating 0  
--------------------------------------------------------
worst battery  -39
My phone have many problems like heating  hanging and fast battery draing.
Hello I am use this phone five day 2 phone really looking excellent battery backup excellent not heating problem camera quality acceptable not bad and all specification good I don t understand others customer reviews like heating problem 
 only look wise good but over heating and battery poor
battery life is very little.
Regarding the battery  I wont say its very good  but for a smart phone with 3G connection enabled  one day battery life is ok for me.
good camera  great screen  heats up a little  nice battery  great looks  nice slim piece perfect for single hand operation  metalic body and most important value for money
 full hd display is awsome   good camera  superb sound led notification light  battery is capable for one and half day normal use
2  Battery life is aprox.
lots of heating when using phone and battery is so poor 
but little heating problm and low battery back up.
This mobile battery is over heating it is not a good lot of heat while working on mobile this is the worst product .
Dear getting very worst battary life .
BATTERY backup is good if not used for heavy gaming and long browsing.
day life as such.
Excellent phone in this range  display is awesome  Battery is good  performance is good  overall phone is good  I was waiting from a long time to buy a phone like this  I do not want to buy a phone which is 5.
Battery Backup is good if you re not a heavy user 
the phone is good but the main problem is abnormal heating and battery draing.
battery backup is also not much good.
The most disappointment one is battery and heating issue.
 handset is awesome features are awesome camera quality awesome but battery not good very highly disappointed with the service of battery and mobile gets heated up very soon music quality good .
the Picture quality is also good  there is little heating while battery charging which reduces subsequently.
All feature are good looking nice and battery backup so strong.
Battery backup is not good.
3. battery back up is not good
battery back not good
lots of heating when using phone and battery is so poor  
3. average battery life
good battery good model  cam not 13mp but good like a6000plus  not at all bad.
there is heating problem  battery is not good you have to charge it 3 times in a day and first day hanging issue i never suggest any one to purchase it 
everything is gud except heating issue and battery life.
Battery life is average to good.
Battery life is average.nice battery  67
the battery backup is good and the sound is just awesome I had a good experience with this mobile just go for it or eles u can also try mi romax evoke 
good battery backup 
Good battery.
good battery backup.
Battery is good for a day use considering 3g 4g use.
battery back up is good
Decent battery life.
Good Battery Backup
Great look  nice touch  ok ok battary life.
good camera  great screen  heats up a little  nice battery  great looks  nice slim piece perfect for single hand operation  metalic body and most important value for money
Heating Issue  After The System Update its reduced and act as per usage just imagine an octa core running with that battery any mobile in 15k segment gets heated up ask anyone or try any brand its there  
Good looking mini handset good display sound very clean and nice good battery back up 
Problem of heating is due to excess of RAM and Battery usage from the they very own Lenovo apps  default  like the launcher itself eats lot of RAM.
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
All are good except battery  the phone looks good  light weight  good finishnig  only 10 gb available in internal memory 
battery backup is very good.
lots of heating when using phone and but battery is GOOD 
good battery life at least for 1 and half day with 2.
Camera is good and battery back is also OK 
So I suggest not to buy this phone because of poor battery life and poor Lenovo service.
Good battery backup and good camera clarity  
Nice phone  good camera battery back up  looks good  it can be handle with one hand.
Secondly  the battery life is reasonable and it should easily last a day under moderate usage.
design is also good battery is less power but noy bad power 
Best battery life i ever used
Battery back up is really good.
Good Battery
Though battery backup is ok and lasts for one day with good multimedia and camera usage  it could be further improved 
heating problem  nothing else  delivery was fast by flipkart  poor battery  all over good nice look 
Sound System is Good Good Battery Life  without gaming .
decent battery life 1.
Good battery life.
The display is the best in this price range and the touch response is good   battery life is so so   build quality is great and so is the RAM management .
Battery backup is good.
The battery life is good it s get changed fast.
Battery life is also good.
the battery backup is good and the sound is just awesome I had a good experience with this mobile just go for it or eles u can also try mi romax evoke.
All feature are good looking nice and battery backup so strong.
Camera quality is too bad worst camera ever seen  don t buy if u want a good camera phone screen quality is at best battery backup is average nd heating up while using continuously 
Battery life is good .
 it is an exellent product at low price with awesome dolby atmos sound and good battery life.
Good battery backup 
3 Battery backup is good exceptional standby time
battery backup is good.
 Super experience the true sound batter life is good.
Battery is good if u use it compromising heavy app usage.
very bad  very very over heating and battery is coming only 4 hours only donot buy lenovo phone please requestly i tell 
For a 5  budget smartphone in sub 10K category I think this is the clear winner currently  with both sims offering 4G  light weight  VR support and decent battery   processor   RAM  other very good contender  Lenovo Vibe P1m with much higher battery capacity .
Phone disply good battery good.
Battery life is average to good.
1 GB ram free at startup  Brilliant Display FULL HD of 1920 x 1020p  Camera is also good  front is also good  battery is of Great capacity 2750mAh .
Battery is good.
yes the battery life could have been much better but i am sure that this issue will also be done alright bt next update.
Good battery backup for normal use.
Battery backup is good  unless you re a heavy gamer .
--------------------------------------------------------
bad quality  -36
 Only negative point is the camera i. e camera quality is not good as boasted of 13mp camera .
and camera quality is not too good.
Primary 13 megapixel camera quality is not good in low light condition.
Like wise phone is good in specifications and looks but i suppose hardware quality is not good .
Hello I am use this phone five day 2 phone really looking excellent battery backup excellent not heating problem camera quality acceptable not bad and all specification good I don t understand others customer reviews like heating problem 
 The Phone i have purchased first day i am very interesting look wise very good and light weight but SIM 2 is 2G support and not coneected the network and camera not good quality and sound effective is good in put the full value if decrease the half the value is very slow bad to hear the songs or voice compare to samsung galaxy S duos with 5 maega pixal camera is very good.
 Build quality is cheap
The phone is too good  worth for the money   most of the apps are pre installed   the speakers are good   hearing quality is good   camera quality is awesome .
In loudspeaker and in inear good quality headphone also.
 Awesome phone  But camera quality is average and gaming graphics is good.
Only heating issue but this issue ia now with every phone but i loved its sound quality original Dolby sound overall at this price phone is very good.
As I am using this mobile for a month  i get to know some of the issues with this such as mobile heating while charging and while on call more than 10 minutes  picture quality is not good for the images taken from this mobile  some of the times the speaker mike is also not working fine while speaking in phone calls.
 handset is awesome features are awesome camera quality awesome but battery not good very highly disappointed with the service of battery and mobile gets heated up very soon music quality good .
Over all good phone within the budget but camera quality very poor .
5 k as aspect is good  camera quality not satisfactory as compare 13 mega fixal.
Xiaomi Redmi note 3 that are good smartphone but lacks the primeum built and design   Ya Coolpad got a fingerprint sensor but it is very lagging in high graphics game and sound quality is also not that good too.
Not The best phone at this price   Sound quality is incredibly good.
charging while mobile on over heating quickly drain battery cam quality not good  big mistake sold my lenovo a 6000 plus good quality  59
Very good phone in this range  display and sound clarity are high quality.
phone performance is best and sound quality is very good.
 It is really a competative product with good quality performance and all required latest features finds very easy to use  i feel highly satisfied in useing the phone very comfortably
 Good build quality looking good sound quality awesome display also good high graphic game run without any problem great deal in this range.
i like this mobile it has really very good sound quality good camera.
Hello I am use this phone five day 2 phone really looking excellent battery backup excellent not heating problem camera quality acceptable not bad and all specification good I don t understand others customer reviews like heating problem 
7  Audio quality is good .
Built quality is good.
n only sound quality is good.
Only heating issue but this issue ia now with every phone but i loved its sound quality original Dolby sound overall at this price phone is very good.
Front and rear camera quality is very good.
Camera quality is good.
Performance  stylinsh and camera quality are good.
Sound quality is as good as of Sony  that I was using from past 5 years .
Camera quality is good but heats at charging time and unable to install Lenovo PC suit software like Nokia PC suit.
Sound quality is good
The display is the best in this price range and the touch response is good   battery life is so so   build quality is great and so is the RAM management .
 cell phone is good like ram rom internal storage but charger is wrust quality my charger now not working.
 Very good mobile  very good sound quality  decent look   of course great delivery by flipkart 
Golden co lour set is looking very stylish  picture quality is also good.
camera quality both from and back good.
camera quality is good.
Sound quality is good only at peak volume.
good camera quality awesome sound and Full HD display quality and super build quality with metal finish.
Sound quality is quite good.
I have seen some reviews saying lack of camera quality  but the camera quality is really good.
In loudspeaker and in inear good quality headphone also.
Camera quality is also good could have been better though.
Display quality is good.
9  Photo quality is good as expected on this price.
the Picture quality is also good  there is little heating while battery charging which reduces subsequently.
BUILD QUALITY IS VERY GOOD
the only good this about this phone is its sound quality.
Good Quality Built And Feels Rich in Hand With Gold Colour.
Like wise phone is good in specifications and looks but i suppose hardware quality is not good .
The camera quality is good for rear camera front camera is so so.
Remaing Camera quality is not as such good like 13MP camera 
 Good Quality of phone But Disappointed With some issues like overheating and Camera Quality camera quality is change littile bit after update of 95mb but need more improvement 
good quality except heating issue.
3  great build quality n fantastic looks  
Good build quality
display quality is good.
camera is good screen quality is very good.
Selfie camera quality is just good enough and can be improved further
Good sound quality  good display quality.
handy light weight sound quality very good .
--------------------------------------------------------
very good sound  42
HD quality is awesome with best sound of a speaker .
2. sound is really awesome
Sound is loud
 Good build quality looking good sound quality awesome display also good high graphic game run without any problem great deal in this range.
Nice Look  Good display  very good sound and good configuration.
i like this mobile it has really very good sound quality good camera.
 Very good mobile  very good sound quality  decent look   of course great delivery by flipkart 
 Good performance with theatermax  good sound quality  441ppi screen quality  1 day high usage battery efficiency  camera quality moderate.
 Phone is working well but how I realise dolbby sound without.
dolby sound again is applaudable.
ion 2750 mah  Screen Guard and guide book also warranty card but not with earphones  DOLBY adjusts any earphone to give out great sound mainly with those rubber earphones .
Dolby atmos sound is crisp and clear  
It is great mobile with best sound effect and it s ran is excellent it s very good for performance 
Sound is amazing.
sound is very good.
Sound  Sound is ok. Not that great like advertised.
Fingerprint sensor is not there Heat quickly as much as of use Dolby sound is good.
awesome sound quality  specifically dolby ATMOS 
Screen is nice sound qualty is very good sometimes lags and heats with 10 minutes usage only
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
ear sound  Stable network connectivity and 3G speeds.
The speaker sound is ultra loud and clear.
Very good sound quality with nice camera and touch.
Loud sound and sound doesn t Crack even at high volume.
Easy and handy fast and awesome sound quality my Iphone headsets works awesome with it 
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound.
 Display and sound is awesome.
The Dolby Atmos enabled sound is crystalline.
Touch is good   sound is very good.
Dolby sound is good but not best  
Sound is good but not great.
speakers are very loud and thanks to Dolby atoms for the good sound .
Good Sound quality
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound
Sound is good and loud  you will enjoy watching movies 
3  Good Sound quality
 I have been using this phone from past 01 month  the phone has seroius problems such as very low sound in Receiver  Network going off in SIM1.
Camera  Touchscreen and sound is just awesome.
 overall its a good phone with a great sound and visual effects  
processor  and good sound quallit.
Sound is good and the display is sharp.
Touch screen and sound is just awesome.
 Good camera  good speakers with very good sound quality and clearity 
Good sound.
Have a excellent sound effects
the battery backup is good and the sound is just awesome I had a good experience with this mobile just go for it or eles u can also try mi romax evoke 
It gives a good sound to hear.
the battery backup is good and the sound is just awesome I had a good experience with this mobile just go for it or eles u can also try mi romax evoke.
camara is good  better than redmi note 3 in morning or night conditions  and the sound is great due to dollby which other phone such as redmi 3  asus le eco  etc dont have .
UI feature is good  sound is either too high or too low.
Best sound quality  picture view is also very clear.
Speaker and sound is also good 
Very good sound quality
Nothing so great to mention about except its brilliant dispaly and excellent sound.
 Super experience the true sound batter life is good.
battery is super  sound is good.
Quality is very good  2 GB RAM   16GB IN Bilt Camera quality is very Good  also DOLBY loud speaker sound is very nice and sweet.
Good sound quality  good display quality.
only thing i loved in this phone is its dolby digital sound quality.
and good vr support and sound is good 
A decent camera quality with decent looks and good sound quality.
Sound is nice .
good sound 
Sound is awesome with Dolby and the stereo speakers.
with awesome sound using dolby atmos.
--------------------------------------------------------
good in looks  27
Looks good  performance is OK OK  but battery and heating problem is the main disadvantage.
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound
Very Good Looks
Good Looks .
Looks good 
very primium looks
Its a best buy if u are planning for a budget phone with elegant looks n awesome specs.
Booked this phone in the very first wave of sale  although the mobile looks and works good the only reason I have to rate it down for is  the heating issue .
Phone doesn t look as sleek from front side  I ordered Goldern Color  may be Black would be a safer choice if you re very particular about looks. 
good looks.
 Looks is good
looks are awesome but heating and camera not so good .
It has good screen quality and very good in looks and perfectly slim and very nice sound.
Good looks and great resolution.
Metal build and good stylish body makes it more attractive looks looks like Apple   Samsung J series phones.
Looks great  No heating problem  battery stands for 1.
Camera is nice and looks are awesome but a heating problem but can be solve by 75MB update and one more problem is the speaker yes when you will hold it your palm will block the speakers and no marshmallow update till now .
nice looks
nice looks on the go plus you have also the advantage of vr bundle but you wont get that with this product have some heating issues but a nice product by lenovo to trust on.
 Looks were awesome but only looks not make the phone looks good.
Looks are good 
Stylish looks.
Overall looks and feel of the phone is good.
Looks is good.
if u compare this wid Iphone then u will find lag but itz looks like u r holding Iphone 5S in ur hand  P 
 Good mobile with better looks.
Looks can be deceptive  
Looks good  no head set with the Phone.
UI is simply elegant looks like iphone
3. looks are great and t s slim and fast too.
The looks are really amazing.
A decent camera quality with decent looks and good sound quality.
Looks are pretty good and stylish.
3  great build quality n fantastic looks  
--------------------------------------------------------
usage  -18
Yeah  there is a bit of heating observed on heavy usage  but for normal usage it is an amazing product considering its price range  build quality and features.
Works for a day under moderate usage.
It lasts only a day with average usage 
battery lasts 5 hrs of heavy usage with wifi
After about 24 hours of usage  I consider this is average mobile.
 all features are good but i face heating problem while charging and continuous usage it s an major draw back about my phone and remaing features are awesome in the range of money 
After a day s usage I found the phone heats on continuous usage for more than 15 or 20 minutes
One and a half day with moderate usage.
Even my iphone 5S also gets warm during heavy usage like gaming etc and also during charging.
 its not meant for a longer usage as the battery is less
Secondly  the battery life is reasonable and it should easily last a day under moderate usage.
Both phones started showing issues after a month of average usage.
You might get a full day battery backup on less to average usage.
After this phone was handed to Mom for her regular usage of mostly whatsapp and youtube with the odd browsing.
No significant heating during heavy usage.
Battery back up is gud enough for normal usage  easily gives a day long battery back up in case of moderate usage.
Battery lasts full day with moderate to heavy usage.
7 hrs on mixed usage of wifi  calls  camera  videos etc.
Battery standby less even though 2750mah need to charge daily though less usage on internet.
Due to its metallic back it dissipate the heat  thats why it feels a bit warm during heavy usage but it doesnt gets that much hot what everyone else has mentioned in their reviews like  iron box     frying pan  etc.
Continuous usage of 5 hours reduced the battery from 100 to 25  Design and look are fine.
Hot in hot conditions but tht is in heavy usage.
No notable heating Issues with regular usage or light games.
There is a 2750 mAh battery powering the handset for a better backup  which last quite long on a moderate usage.
So if you just want to flaunt and not an high mobile user this mobile can be ur good companion but if your usage is high  seriously avoid it.
The battery gives a backup of 1 day  with optimum usage   on wifi   3G day long.
Battery is good if u use it compromising heavy app usage.
After 24 hours of medium to heavy usage  I have found this phone to score a lot more positive marks than negative  contrary to what the other reviews say in general.
--------------------------------------------------------
design  15
2 Gb free ram  superb display clarity  great dolby sound output on speakers  great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart.
good design
Its agood mib with good design and features .
I recived this phone two days before phone is very good stylish slim in design  but i didnt gt head phone.
Sleek Design
Nice model so sleek design light weight good camera and great performance 
 The specification is good light weight great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart 
1  Light weight and sleek design
 Wonderful design and performance.
Overall its a value product  display  music   metallic design is great.
Performance is really awesome  Fully aluminium casing light weight excellent display and stylish design so I will rate this 5.
 lenovo made a good design cell phone   
design is good and gold color is damn attractive 
 I thought this phone will be having very good features with the reasonable price and design also look good  so I purchased.
Good in Design
Its a nice phone  design is premium.
handy  light decent camera  easy UI  good sound and sleek design 
 it just awsme style look design very light in weight easy to handle its all want you want.
--------------------------------------------------------
next day  -14
Phone is best overall but because of this heating problem i have to return the phone very next day.
i got from flipkrt and next day the phone was available  but it heat too much without any app download and later i had a hassal with flipkart to return it  pathetic service by flipkart and also lenovo i never thought they will get the product like this 
I got it the day after the next day I ordered it.
 I bought this phone on 30 march delivered on next day.
the delivery was on the next day.
Faster delivery I received in a next day.
I have ordered the phone on 23rd got it delivered next day by flipkart  super fast delivery  thank you to Flipkart.
Received the next day after 23 March sale   thanks to flipkart to deliver quickly.
Next Day I could communicate to FLipkart but they wanted to some troubleshooting using Flipkart s tool.
Thanks to flipkart for next day delivery .
Received the mobile on next day.
Recently i Purchased Lenovo k5 mobile which has a problem in it  so created replacement request before 6 days ago they said our customer care representative will contact you on the next day  while i am in driving next day i got a call so i unable to answer the call even i tried to call back but it doesn t work.
6  WS retails delivered next day within 24hrs though they mentioned 5 days.
Booked on 2nd Apr 2016 night around 10pm got next day 1pm.
--------------------------------------------------------
octa core processor  12
The memory is the best and processor is like a mini laptop.
Camera is not so good as it should be  though it is 13mp and front 5mp  GPU  adreno 405  is good and Processor is also good.
first of all this phone is costing only 8500 INR with having octa Core processor sounds good.
Camera Dolby Sound Processor is very good.
It s as a stable processor with less heat issue as it s one which is used in Huawei Honor 5X 
awesome dud  vry sexy smooth processor  in love with k5   
Solid  waterproof  great battery and though on paper has a weaker processor  due to better optimisations performs much better.
Multi tasking is easy and thanks to its great processor 
Good Processor
good processor
battery backup also good  processor also good.
good processor 
Overall   a good buy if Lenovo rolls out timely updates   Even though the phone has a powerful processor   it feels sluggish due to the buggy   choppy Vibe UI .
--------------------------------------------------------
with lenovo vibe  11
I dont understand why Lenovo do not work research on heating and camera issue eventhough they are very old and common problems.
It was safely cover wrapped and with Lenovo Warranty Assured sticker and hall mark on the front of the box and on side.
After using the phone for few days i am not so happy with lenovo.
I am happy with the Vibe UI and can change to Andriod Stock UI.
It would be better if LENOVO provided
It is my first lenovo phone after sony xperia.
I have contacted Lenovo technical guy with heating and camera quality issue and below is teh reply.
Its easy to operate with famous Lenovo menu.
This is my second Lenovo purchase and first one was tab.
This is my second Lenovo purchase.
Finally I have changed my Launcher from there own to Google which is pretty decent and saves few more ram and tried to freez Lenovo launcher which looks quit hard and I don t even have the option of disable unlike other 3rd party apps does.
good performance best at tis price comparing with Samsung j series and micromax mobiles Lenovo given a best   
Apart from that Nothing all are positive things to be noted yes ofcourse few people mention about the camera clarity that could have more improved as this is 13pix Cam and Dual network wise I have to manual change sim slot removing back cover if I have to switch 3G or 4G from one sim network to another sim network which I don t have option unlike other Lenovo mobiles.
Last but not the least Lenovo launcher doesn t have App tray which is annoying and very hard to organize the apps which Icons are lying on the screen not in the Menu tray.
So I suggest not to buy this phone because of poor battery life and poor Lenovo service.
phone look is very good compare to other lenovo phone
Customer care executive took the call and asked for IMEI  finally she told this IMEI is not present in Lenovo Data base.
VIbeUI of lenovo is also good.
 I m totally disappointed with Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus due to over heating problem and batter backup.
And the last Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus advantages is the very high quality premium 
That s what pretty great about Lenovo Vibe K5 its midrange budget smartphone.
Initially I was skeptical buying this phone after reading so many negative reviews  but as in past I have used many Lenovo phones laptops and my experience was always good with Lenovo  therefore I thought to go ahead buying this phone  and I am happy now after buying this.
Much better than the Vibe S1 s plastic.
So i visit the lenovo care.
This is my second Lenovo mobile phone in the last one year and both the times I am having problems with the phones.
I purchase mobile Lenovo K5 vibe plus and when I got that box and opened that there was no earphone in mobile box.
best Lenovo 
I had purchase Lenovo K5 from Flipkart and as per reviews  it s heating problem is resolved with new updated from lenovo.
Overall lenovo quality is very low inspite of that ASUS phones are better in quality in same price.
Phone n features are good but I am facing problems with volume settings automatically the notification sound gets low n high  lenovo shud luk into the matter.
Second Lenovo K5 Note disadvantages is that it does not have fast battery charging technology.
 it would have been better if lenovo has provided a cooling pad case with this phone.
Apart from this I was totally satisfied with this LENOVO VIBE K5 PLUS.
It would be greatful if Lenovo addresses the issues of heating  battery and camera otherwise I have to return the phone.
 As crappy as it could be  yet again Lenovo has proved they sell trash online and flipkart being their face has also proved they support cheaters.
--------------------------------------------------------
very light weight  8
It is light weight and and almost thin.
 The specification is good light weight great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart 
Looks very nice and light weight after inserting the battery.
Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus disadvantages or cons is with the primary camera performance in low light condition which is not good at all  and so as the secondary camera as well.
Camera  Poor quality photos under low light conditions which is actually disappointing
Notification light is also good.
Camera quality decent in good light
All are good except battery  the phone looks good  light weight  good finishnig  only 10 gb available in internal memory 
it captures very good pics with good amount of detail under good lighting conditions but there is some noise in low light.
the only problem you can face is the camera in low light.
 Light Weight and easy to use 
Camera struggles to focus on object but gives good results with good light conditions.
Camera is just ok as the low light photography is not good.
Especially in low light it produces below average quality pictures.
Less weight
Camera is very nice in natural light and in artificial light you should use other camera app to get better results.
Camera need to improve in low light 
Nice model so sleek design light weight good camera and great performance 
6. back cam is also good for outdoor capture   mm gud in low light too   
Very light weight  sleek n slim and look wise very trendy.
i am using the lenovo k5 plus smart phone it is a excellant phone battery   camera clearity nice   also look very nice  light weight phone  
Camera will not work well in low light.
Mobile look   weight is very ideal.
Photos taken in low light is not clear.
It is very light weight  looks great  though the aluminium body makes it a little too smooth and I m a bit clumsy  but I haven t dropped it yet 
But only the selfie camera does not work properly in low light .
Works up to the mark in low light as well.
--------------------------------------------------------
look and feel  8
Touch feel is inconsistent  so do gaming performance.
Sound  look and feel is very good.
 Look and feel  sound good  but heating like anything while charging  or if you operate continuously.
Aluminium Casing  actually its Plastic with Aluminium Look and feel though it does look good .
Good feel to hold.
I have bought this phone looks pretty decent and good look feel and light weight.
2  Premium look and feel
Look and feel very good.
It doesn t feel so light and cheap as was in the case of the A6000 .
--------------------------------------------------------
no heating issue  7
 Good product sound good camera good battery back up good no hanging only issue is heating overall nice 
Amazingggg performance camera is so nice ui is solo good no heating issues its perfect for budget gamer  
 Its good experience for me with filpkart i listen filpkart sale Quality product i relay not happy with Filpkart CSR team what i brought Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus mobile from Filpkart its geeting overheating issue 
I would not recommend this mobile  because of overheating issue.
yes it was having too much heating issues but now after updating to 2 new system updates its stable and not getting hot.
and after its latest update this device get more reliable and no heating issue now.
Many of my friends have said that   it has major heating issue  which is more or less correct   But nobody thinks that it s got a METALLIC BACK Cover  which is removable .
I have two more phones from lenovo which do not have such heating issues  A6000    but this phones beats all odds  sarcastically   .
No heating issue.
 everything is very n ice but i am facing with the rear camera and heating issue  heating is not too much but the rear camera is worst  the front is only 5 mp but is very nice but the rear camera is not as good and looks like 2 mp .
First of all  others are telling about heating problem  but i want to tell you there is an update of about 150 MB which solved this problem and now they re is no heating issue  so.
No notable heating Issues with regular usage or light games.
Compare to K3Note   A7000  the heating issue is extreme high  it leads to ear pain and headache.
I upgraded the System Software immediately and except for one crash of Viber UI during restoring using my Gmail Id used on previous phone  it s been working fine  No commonly experienced issues like call drops  hanging  heating etc.
Not that much heating issue as many of review i saw from people
BEFORE UPDATE you feel HEATING ISSUE  but AFTER UPDATING there will not so much heating Issue  I think whatever level it heats up after updating phone once  is because of snapdragon processor.
after updating the Lenovo K5  heating issue is gone  normal heating  which is acceptable.
I would say that after some system update there will be no heating issue.
No heating issue .
after update there are no any heating issue and performence increase 
--------------------------------------------------------
features are good  7
 all features are good but i face heating problem while charging and continuous usage it s an major draw back about my phone and remaing features are awesome in the range of money 
all features are good.
This Phone is very good with it s price features are good.
The other features are very good.
5k when compared to all the budget phones like lenovo it is very decent phone with best features but only problem is over heating while charging but all are good for this price primary camera is best but front camera is shaking while rotating here and their.
Overall the phone features are very good in this price segment.
 Its good in looks  features are good  but This phone is like lenova 6000plus .
all other features are very good like screen resolution   music   RAm   touch  looks ETC .
But other features are good.
except these issues  remainign software and features are good.
because of this only one reason i returned mobile  rest of the features are very good 
 Great phone  no heating problem  good camera  All other features are excellent.
Do not buy this as there are many other phone also available with good features at this Price.
 This is a very good mobile and in a very low cost all features are latest as well .
 handset is awesome features are awesome camera quality awesome but battery not good very highly disappointed with the service of battery and mobile gets heated up very soon music quality good .
For this Price range all other features are good enough 
Features are good and amazing thing to me is screen casting  screen mirroring 
Rest of the features are good in the price mentioned   but it heats in such a way that you feel like putting the phone under AC or dip in water.
All features are good and working smoothly.
Phone n features are good but I am facing problems with volume settings automatically the notification sound gets low n high  lenovo shud luk into the matter.
--------------------------------------------------------
and light weight  5
It is light weight and and almost thin.
Very light weight  sleek n slim and look wise very trendy.
Looks very nice and light weight after inserting the battery.
Nice model so sleek design light weight good camera and great performance 
 The specification is good light weight great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart 
 Light Weight and easy to use 
It is very light weight  looks great  though the aluminium body makes it a little too smooth and I m a bit clumsy  but I haven t dropped it yet 
--------------------------------------------------------
delivery by flipkart  5
The delivery by Flipkart is awesome.
 The specification is good light weight great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart 
2 Gb free ram  superb display clarity  great dolby sound output on speakers  great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart.
 delivery by flipkart is perfect and so it will get a 5 star but due to camera 4. star 
Speedy delivery by flipkart.
--------------------------------------------------------
no heating issues  5
The phone had heating issues at first but the system updates removed it.
yes it was having too much heating issues but now after updating to 2 new system updates its stable and not getting hot.
Heating issues  has been low since the 75MB update but still heating feels if used for more than 10mins continuously 
I have two more phones from lenovo which do not have such heating issues  A6000    but this phones beats all odds  sarcastically   .
overall camera performance below average Heating issues really disappointing other factors are ok. Pros 
As I am using this mobile for a month  i get to know some of the issues with this such as mobile heating while charging and while on call more than 10 minutes  picture quality is not good for the images taken from this mobile  some of the times the speaker mike is also not working fine while speaking in phone calls.
4 calls from Flipkart but unable to communicate due to technical issues.
Lenovo has pushed two updates which takes care of any such issues.
Major issues  for day.
There are some heating issues too.
Vibe K5 also started showing similar issues with Internet  Bluetooth and Wifi.
No major heating issues.
I am highly disappointed with this issues with Lenovo.
I upgraded the System Software immediately and except for one crash of Viber UI during restoring using my Gmail Id used on previous phone  it s been working fine  No commonly experienced issues like call drops  hanging  heating etc.
Coming to the product  I it a pretty good one apart from minor issues which you can expect at this price range.
Amazingggg performance camera is so nice ui is solo good no heating issues its perfect for budget gamer  
I tried all means to fix this looks those are inbuild hidden apps or Android apps or Kernel issue which has direct impact on heating related issues.
if there are such issues.
Other Issues 
No notable heating Issues with regular usage or light games.
I find heating issues not that bad after the update  hope Android m would be great.
I took a huge risk even with so many negative issues and purchased this phone.
Observed heating issues with the set when received.
The phone has some real heating issues which makes its usage uncomfortable at times.
I used it for a week and it was good no issues.
Even after reset issues remained same.
I know you can handle tiny issues of slight heating while playing heavy games  
No major issues faced.
--------------------------------------------------------
value for money  4
Overall  huge value of money and complete 5 stars to the phone.
great value for money go for it.
For a budget  10 000 device is a great value for money go with it .
 The Phone i have purchased first day i am very interesting look wise very good and light weight but SIM 2 is 2G support and not coneected the network and camera not good quality and sound effective is good in put the full value if decrease the half the value is very slow bad to hear the songs or voice compare to samsung galaxy S duos with 5 maega pixal camera is very good.
so overall good value of money 
I also see that heating issues are mostly happening only in these Chinese Phones and also SAR Value is high.
SAR Value is high about .
Overall its a value product  display  music   metallic design is great.
complete money for value thing camera is good but not best look is pretty sexy processing is awesome ui is good overall sexy phone go for it except the camera 
Best value for money product under 10k.
good camera  great screen  heats up a little  nice battery  great looks  nice slim piece perfect for single hand operation  metalic body and most important value for money
SAR value comparatively very low when compared to other K series of Lenovo 
So at last Very good value for money 
So as u can see Con are nitpicking and at this price this is a great deal and good value for money.
Good value for money 
--------------------------------------------------------
software update  -4
The phone is really good from all aspects except the major heating problem  which still remains even after the latest software update of 119mb.
Camera is not so much good   software issue.
Heating problem persist even after software update but less than earlier   and it is nearly as with other android phones  
NOTE  those who are getting heating problem should update their phone to the latest software or firmware  the 75mb ota update which is basically for removing all the problems in the phone.
Conclusion  The phone is great in term of hardware but the software is considered as underdog as above mentioned issues can be solved with efficient and quality code.
NOTE  those who are getting heating problem should update their phone to the latest software or firmwar 
3  Software is not that great 
--------------------------------------------------------
a long time  -4
If your using long time it s gets heated.
Excellent phone in this range  display is awesome  Battery is good  performance is good  overall phone is good  I was waiting from a long time to buy a phone like this  I do not want to buy a phone which is 5.
30 mins please don t even consider this phone this phone is hot it can reach 45 deg in 30 mins and you cant speak for long time your ears will get heated well .
since the body is metallic sure that we will experience some heat dissipation But only when it s is using for a long time but it s normal.
fi and continue surfing for long time.
 Flipkart disappointed a lot by replacing the first phone Lenovo K5 Plus with scratches after a long time duration.
sir a long time wait lenovo vibe k5 phone but when it buy camera is not be working i am worried to lenovo.
The phone gets too heated while charging  browsing net and keeping net on for a long time.
 Getting heat while watching videos for long time.
i got only problem is that this phone get heated when you used it long time .
Therefore unable to use the phone for long time.
Battery takes long time to charge  no fast charger
Touch is smooth but lags sometimes when the app remains idle for some long time.
Yes  the phone does heat up even then when you just playing with the screen for long time or browse the Internet.
--------------------------------------------------------
for long time  -4
If your using long time it s gets heated.
Excellent phone in this range  display is awesome  Battery is good  performance is good  overall phone is good  I was waiting from a long time to buy a phone like this  I do not want to buy a phone which is 5.
30 mins please don t even consider this phone this phone is hot it can reach 45 deg in 30 mins and you cant speak for long time your ears will get heated well .
since the body is metallic sure that we will experience some heat dissipation But only when it s is using for a long time but it s normal.
fi and continue surfing for long time.
 Flipkart disappointed a lot by replacing the first phone Lenovo K5 Plus with scratches after a long time duration.
sir a long time wait lenovo vibe k5 phone but when it buy camera is not be working i am worried to lenovo.
The phone gets too heated while charging  browsing net and keeping net on for a long time.
 Getting heat while watching videos for long time.
i got only problem is that this phone get heated when you used it long time .
Therefore unable to use the phone for long time.
Battery takes long time to charge  no fast charger
Touch is smooth but lags sometimes when the app remains idle for some long time.
Yes  the phone does heat up even then when you just playing with the screen for long time or browse the Internet.
--------------------------------------------------------
camera very good  4
It s a very nice product with a very good camera and music quality.
Camera performance is not very good  but with google camera  it seems bit better  though I have not tested it thoroughly.
A very nice phone with very good performance  camera sharp display nice look etc.
With some heating issue in starting now after 20days it s OK. Its rear camera is ok. front camera is very good.
 Mobile look are very nice   camera is good click .
Camera very good but heating problem.
5k when compared to all the budget phones like lenovo it is very decent phone with best features but only problem is over heating while charging but all are good for this price primary camera is best but front camera is shaking while rotating here and their.
Very good sound quality with nice camera and touch.
Front camera 5MP is very good.
 The Phone i have purchased first day i am very interesting look wise very good and light weight but SIM 2 is 2G support and not coneected the network and camera not good quality and sound effective is good in put the full value if decrease the half the value is very slow bad to hear the songs or voice compare to samsung galaxy S duos with 5 maega pixal camera is very good.
phone is good but camera is very poor.
especially camera features very good 
also the front camera is very good.
Very good product  no heating and camera is also good .
The Camera is also decent and the front cam is very good.
Every thing is good specially front camera is very good and back is not that much good but it is also more than average but one problem is there in calling you can not pick calls during calling with someone and also conferencing is not possible so please I request to lenovo to please resolve this problem as soon as possible and I am writing this review after using the phone one month.
 everything is very n ice but i am facing with the rear camera and heating issue  heating is not too much but the rear camera is worst  the front is only 5 mp but is very nice but the rear camera is not as good and looks like 2 mp .
 Good camera  good speakers with very good sound quality and clearity 
 handset is awesome features are awesome camera quality awesome but battery not good very highly disappointed with the service of battery and mobile gets heated up very soon music quality good .
In time delivery of product is appreciated but about Lenevo Vibe K5 Plus  the Camera is not very good as expected and heating problem is there.
Good Phone but very poor camera quality.
camera is very good
very bad camera selfy good  battery very poor  camera sensar is very slow
It looks very slim used for 12 hours and it is pretty good and the Camera shutter speed is slight laggy.
--------------------------------------------------------
issue after update  -4
But after S034 update this issue is no more present.
iam waiting for android6 update.
I think  this issue needs to be resolved by Lenovo in next update.
and after its latest update this device get more reliable and no heating issue now.
They should fix the issue of changing the resolution of image in the next update then may be the camera quality can improve.
But after a single update no problem  no over heating.
After new update it heats like iron nd battery drains in 1 hr or less.
Camera is nice and looks are awesome but a heating problem but can be solve by 75MB update and one more problem is the speaker yes when you will hold it your palm will block the speakers and no marshmallow update till now .
Fix these two issues with an OTA Update and it will be perfect.
Really good phone great performance but has lags while playing heavy games like FIFA 16 but does not have marshmallow update like lenovo k3 note 
There are heating issues which reportedly won t be there after the first update is installed.
having some heating issue but was solved after the update
Before a small update from Lenovo this phone was had heating problem  camera issues.
BEFORE UPDATE you feel HEATING ISSUE  but AFTER UPDATING there will not so much heating Issue  I think whatever level it heats up after updating phone once  is because of snapdragon processor.
Previously i also thought of returning the product but i keep faith on lenovo and hope the problems will be solved in the next update.
I would say that after some system update there will be no heating issue.
This includes a major update as well.
Even I didn t find any new update to resolve this heating problem.
after update there are no any heating issue and performence increase 
--------------------------------------------------------
rear camera  -3
twin rear.
With some heating issue in starting now after 20days it s OK. Its rear camera is ok. front camera is very good.
 Camera is too bad  its worst than 5MP rear cameras.
Horrible rear camera.
2. rear and front Camera a is one of the worst i took snap in my life.
Rear camera is better than poor with very limited settings.
Rear camera is pretty good.
 everything is very n ice but i am facing with the rear camera and heating issue  heating is not too much but the rear camera is worst  the front is only 5 mp but is very nice but the rear camera is not as good and looks like 2 mp .
Front camera is good but rear one is not like 13mp.
Rear camera is also good.
Front Camera is little bit good as compare to rear camera.
Rear camera is not upto mark like a 8 MP camera but good on outdoor condition
rear and front camera are good.
Rear Camera is not good it don t detailed image even is super fine mode  if anyone is looking for a good camera this is not the right phone.
13 MP rear camera is as good as a 8 MP cheap chinese cameraphone.
--------------------------------------------------------
apps  3
 this phone has snapdragon 615 msm8939 processor but flipkart   lenovo is claiming that it has snapdragon 616. i had tested it with cpuz cpux antu   many other apps.
 Very good mobile within budget having all the necessary apps and with good configuration for a middle class person.
The preloaded apps were very few  so had to download all the essential apps.
I think lenovo should introduce internal apps menu rather populating them on home screen itself  
All other apps are working fine.
I tried all means to fix this looks those are inbuild hidden apps or Android apps or Kernel issue which has direct impact on heating related issues.
Have to rely on MX Player  Google Music  Photo   ES explorer apps as lenevo apps are poor.
Lenovo Companion and McAfee Security are great apps which help you a lot.
it hides all the important apps by doing so.
Also Lenovo installs lots of useless apps on mobiles  and Laptops as well .
Last but not the least Lenovo launcher doesn t have App tray which is annoying and very hard to organize the apps which Icons are lying on the screen not in the Menu tray.
Display is good  Switching between apps is quite easy.
virus app  MAINLY   and also unnecessary apps  If Possible .
further if you are not happy with that heating problem remove all unwanted apps and especially lenovo apps which run continously in the background.
 This phone response is very very slow apps take more time Normal time to open also got hang very badly  
--------------------------------------------------------
flip kart  -3
I appreciate the delivery of the flip kart 
I called flip kart and raised the issue and they told the battery temperature would be allowable up to 45degree.
I have purchased Lenovo vibe K5 plus mobile from flip kart and finds considerable heating issues and very poor in camera performance.
--------------------------------------------------------
worth for money  3
Totally worth for money.
The phone is too good  worth for the money   most of the apps are pre installed   the speakers are good   hearing quality is good   camera quality is awesome .
It s really worth for money.
It s worth for money 
 Mobile was fantastic  worth for price  everything is fine except battery   mobile heating problem.
--------------------------------------------------------
back cover  2
Opening the phone s back cover is quite easy if you do it the right way  there s a small edge on the bottom left corner from where you can open it.
kart i received defective piece with un proper back cover.
No back cover with the content
Many of my friends have said that   it has major heating issue  which is more or less correct   But nobody thinks that it s got a METALLIC BACK Cover  which is removable .
--------------------------------------------------------
support  -2
I have ordered VR glasses separately  as this phone is coming with theatremax support.
2 VR support is very good
VR support   cheapest Android phone with VR support  
fully satisfied with lenovo and the vr support is like cherry on a cake one of the killer feature at these price point 
--------------------------------------------------------
in low light  2
Camera need to improve in low light 
Camera will not work well in low light.
it captures very good pics with good amount of detail under good lighting conditions but there is some noise in low light.
Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus disadvantages or cons is with the primary camera performance in low light condition which is not good at all  and so as the secondary camera as well.
the only problem you can face is the camera in low light.
Photos taken in low light is not clear.
Camera is just ok as the low light photography is not good.
6. back cam is also good for outdoor capture   mm gud in low light too   
But only the selfie camera does not work properly in low light .
Especially in low light it produces below average quality pictures.
Camera  Poor quality photos under low light conditions which is actually disappointing
Works up to the mark in low light as well.
--------------------------------------------------------
hours  2
45 hours  Very tough to wait for charging 44 .
its a smartphone with high end processors it will generate bit heat  if u play and talk for long hours of course it will heat up.
I just received it in 48 hours with excellent packing the GOLDEN K5 plus .
It looks very slim used for 12 hours and it is pretty good and the Camera shutter speed is slight laggy.
I tried with WiFi ON for about 2 hours  heating was not abnormal  but after sometime even for 5 min call  it got heated up more.
Battery  For my usage  the batteryeasily lasted more than 36 hours which is pretty good.
--------------------------------------------------------
2 days  2
last 2 days facing calling issue this phone not good for my side.
 The phone what I received 2 days back is good but there is so much of heating problem.
i had used this fon 3 days and replace it with Huawei Honer holly2 plus.
Some person called me after 2 days and accepted my return when I was out of town.
--------------------------------------------------------
service center  1
Lenovo service center are also present all most every city.
what i dont understand  if i visit a service center why the hell i need you and your BILKUL PAKKA replacement warranty.
Lenovo service center every part of India and there service is also good.
--------------------------------------------------------
upto mark  1
 Display is good  viewing angles are fine  minor lags occurs but they are negligible  Camera is not upto the mark   low light and indoor photos seem to be too noisy.
 Good but not upto the mark.
 phone is damn awesome  camera is not upto the mark but overall it is a great phone  don t think and buy it 
--------------------------------------------------------
superb  -1
it looks awesome and sound quality is amazing my all problems are solved with related to mobile finally i gt a superb mobile  .
--------------------------------------------------------
fine  1
Even i also faced heating issue with this mobile  But after upgrading to latest firmware which is available on system settings its working fine.
--------------------------------------------------------
k3 note  -1
 I gone for this set only because of its CAMERA   VIDEO Spec which is same as K3 NOTE.
they are ready to give another mobile but same k5 note vive plus .
After update note much heating issue.
I researched  processor  batter  GPU  Screen  Camera  lens  technology  etc  and waited for four months to purchase red mi note 3. but due to their bad marketting technique and no stock availability  I purchased this lenovo k 5  .
better than k3 note.
--------------------------------------------------------
factory reset  1
I already installed an OTA update and factory reset the mobile once. 
--------------------------------------------------------
2 gb ram  -1
2 GB RAM 1MB is free on my new phone 
5 ghz coupled with 2 gb ram deliver decent performance.
Quality is very good  2 GB RAM   16GB IN Bilt Camera quality is very Good  also DOLBY loud speaker sound is very nice and sweet.
2 GB RAM is enough for me.
1 GB ram free at startup  Brilliant Display FULL HD of 1920 x 1020p  Camera is also good  front is also good  battery is of Great capacity 2750mAh .
2 Gb free ram  superb display clarity  great dolby sound output on speakers  great design  looking exclusive  good delivery and packaging by flipkart.
 System lag is experienced  not good for 2GB RAM  around 1 GB remains free 
--------------------------------------------------------
at price range  1
Finally i would say that in this price range  you should not expect more.
--------------------------------------------------------
lenovo vibe k5  1
I had purchase Lenovo K5 from Flipkart and as per reviews  it s heating problem is resolved with new updated from lenovo.
 I m totally disappointed with Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus due to over heating problem and batter backup.
And the last Lenovo Vibe K5 Plus advantages is the very high quality premium 
Second Lenovo K5 Note disadvantages is that it does not have fast battery charging technology.
i ordered vibe k5 mobile  they delivered to me after 2 days.
 Don t Buy Lenovo vibe k5 plus mobile very very worst mobile Very Heating problem Camera quality normal   recharge demo sim not working in both sim slot .
Lenovo k5 plus is just awesome   
That s what pretty great about Lenovo Vibe K5 its midrange budget smartphone.
 I am purchases lenovo vibe K5 plus on may 5th my mobile observed heating problem.
So Lenovo K5 is comparable and in fact lenovo k5 wins.
Apart from this I was totally satisfied with this LENOVO VIBE K5 PLUS.
I have purchased Lenovo vibe K5 plus mobile from flip kart and finds considerable heating issues and very poor in camera performance.
i bought vibe k5 mobile on 31 march 2016 even after knowing about negative feedback because of budget constaraint.
Coming to the real topic of discussion  the Lenovo vibe k5 plus is pretty sturdy and handsome looking smartphone.
I purchase mobile Lenovo K5 vibe plus and when I got that box and opened that there was no earphone in mobile box.
--------------------------------------------------------
excellent  1
3. sound excellent.
--------------------------------------------------------
13 mp  -1
the 13 mp primary camera is taking pictures like a 5 mp camera and does not give any clarity at all.
camera is good as a13 mp should infact almost equivalent to Redmi note 3s 16 mp 
13 MP rear camera is as good as a 8 MP cheap chinese cameraphone.
--------------------------------------------------------
in price range  1
The build quality is one of the best in this price range.
Finally i would say that in this price range  you should not expect more.
Conclusion Nice phone for the price range but donot expect too much.